Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1446.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [3.99] COMMISSIONS ARE ADVISORY. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a commission established by law for a limited purpose and duration is purely advisory. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to commissions established by law on or after that date. new text end